North Dakota, session 69, HB1136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 4.1-09-18 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. If a first purchaser fails to submit the assessments as required by this section, the
council may impose a penalty equal toof five hundred dollars or ten percent of the
amount due, whichever is greater, plus interest at the rate of six percent per annum
from the due date.
Page No. 1 25.0430.01000